District of Columbia statutes.
44-204

Qualifications of technical personnel.

(a)

A clinical laboratory performing only waived tests shall employ testing personnel who meet the qualifications set out in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

(b)

(1)

A clinical laboratory performing moderately complex tests shall employ a laboratory director, a technical consultant, a clinical consultant, and testing personnel. A person may function in more than one of these capacities if he or she meets the qualifications specified in this chapter and in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

(2)

The laboratory director, technical consultant, clinical consultant, and testing personnel shall meet the qualifications as specified in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

(c)

(1)

A clinical laboratory performing highly complex tests shall employ a laboratory director, a general supervisor, a technical supervisor, a clinical consultant, and testing personnel. A person may function in more than one of these capacities if he or she meets the qualifications specified in this chapter and in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

(2)

The laboratory director, general supervisor, technical supervisor, clinical consultant, and testing personnel shall meet qualifications as specified in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

(3)

In addition to the requirements set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, a clinical laboratory that performs highly complex tests in the subspecialty of cytology shall employ a cytology general supervisor, a cytology technical supervisor, and a cytotechnologist. A person may function in more than one of these capacities if he or she meets the qualifications specified in this chapter and in rules issued pursuant to § 44-213.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-182, § 5, 35 DCR 7718
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5012(d), 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5012(d) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
D.C. Law 16-33 rewrote the section.
1981 Ed., § 32-1504.